Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.220

Appeals—Bond for damages.

An appeal may be taken from the decree by filing notice thereof not later than ten days after issuance of the decree. The appellant shall be required to file an appeal bond of not less than one thousand dollars and sufficient in amount to cover possible damages to neighboring properties due to delay in carrying out the decree.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.08.220. Prior: 1941 c 20 ss 11, 12; Rem. Supp. 1941 ss 2849-2b, 2849-2c.]